Mississippi, session 2026, HB72.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Delta Medical Apprenticeship Program Act" (MS DMAP). SECTION 2.  As used in this act, the following terms shall have the meanings as defined in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a) "Apprenticeship program" means the Mississippi Delta Medical Apprenticeship Program. (b)  "Counties of the Mississippi Delta" means, Bolivar, Carroll, Coahoma, Desoto, Holmes, Humphreys, Issaquena, Leflore, Panola, Quitman, Sharkey, Sunflower, Tallahatchie, Tate, Tunica, Warren, Washington and Yazoo Counties. (c) "Department" means the State Department of Education. (d) "Participating licensed medical facility" means a facility located in the counties of the Mississippi Delta including, but not limited to, a hospital, nursing home, medical clinic, medical or occupational rehabilitation facility, hospice facility, skilled nursing facility, dialysis or renal care center, blood bank, pharmacy or ambulatory surgical center, that has entered into a memorandum of agreement with a local school district to provide apprenticeships to qualifying high school students, subject to approval by the State Board of Education and the appropriate licensing entity that regulates the services and practices of such facility. SECTION 3. (1)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the State Board of Education, in conjunction with the State Board of Medical Licensure, the Mississippi Board of Nursing and the Mississippi Hospital Association, shall establish and implement a program known as the Mississippi Delta Medical Apprenticeship Program (MS DMAP) for public school students enrolled in Grades 9 through 12, for the purpose of creating a pathway to develop a health care professions pipeline within the underserved and underrepresented populations in the eighteen (18) counties of the Mississippi Delta, to increase the availability and presence of qualified health care professionals in those counties experiencing a critical shortage of such professionals.  The provisions of the MS DMAP shall adhere to the requirements of the Mississippi Learn to Earn Act for Extended Learning Opportunities as provided in Sections 37-71-7, 37-71-9 and 31-71-11. (2)  The apprenticeship program established under subsection (1) of this section for the introduction and training of qualified students for potential careers in health care professions must, at a minimum, be a full-year program of academic and practical application instruction, during which time students must be provided onsite hands-on instruction to increase the students' preparation for a premedical or allied health curriculum and to strengthen academic competitiveness.  Depending on the area of health expertise and the required skills and certifications to qualify an individual for employment, the apprenticeship program may extend beyond a single year of participation, as determined by the State Board of Education, the participating school district and the participating licensed medical facility providing the instruction.  The lecture-based portions of instruction in the apprenticeship program must be conducted by: (a)  Instructors with adequate certification in science or mathematics who are licensed by the State Department of Education; (b)  Instructors who teach science or mathematics at the postsecondary level; or (c)  Licensed or certified health care professionals who have the requisite number of years of experience and qualifications equivalent to what is required of an individual licensed by the department as an expert citizen under Section 37-3-2(6)(c). (3)  Eligibility for participation in the apprenticeship program is limited to students who: (a)  Maintain a cumulative 2.25 grade point average on a 4.0 scale; (b)  Are recommended by their science or mathematics teachers, or professional school counselor; (c)  Have a consistent record of attendance; (d)  Display positive attitudes, character and citizenship; (e)  Express a desire to expand their knowledge of health care and medicine; (f)  Reside in one (1) of the counties of the Mississippi Delta where a participating licensed medical facility is located; and (g)  Present proof of having health insurance or Medicaid. (4)  Before any student is accepted for participation under the criteria of subsection (3) of this section, that student's parent, legal guardian or custodian must submit written authorization agreeing to the student's participation in the apprenticeship program. (5)  The apprenticeship program must include, but not be limited to, the following components: (a)  An orientation, which the parents are encouraged to attend; (b)  ACT instruction and practice exams; (c)  Instructional interaction with licensed and/or certified medical or other health care professionals; (d)  Presentations from licensed and/or certified medical or other health care professionals; (e)  Health-related hands-on activities; (f)  CPR certification; (g)  ACT and certification examination registration as needed; and (h)  A waiver of fees for the required certification assessments. (6)  Outside of the traditional scholastic year, the apprenticeship program must consist of a full day of academic, research or laboratory instruction beginning at 8:00 a.m. and lasting until 3:00 p.m. daily on Monday through Friday of each week for a minimum of four (4) weeks between the end date of a scholastic year and the beginning of the immediately following scholastic year.  During each week, two (2) days must be dedicated to ACT and career certification preparation, and the remaining three (3) days must be dedicated to health care career preparation. SECTION 4. Participation in the apprenticeship program is limited to students who reside in any of the counties of the Mississippi Delta, who are entering Grades 9 through 12 in a public school, and who have submitted to the department a completed application on the form designed and supplied by the department, the State Board of Medical Licensure, the Mississippi Board of Nursing and the Mississippi Hospital Association.  The department shall make applications available to each school district on May 31 of each year and shall establish the deadline for accepting applications. SECTION 5. Students selected to participate in the apprenticeship program who successfully complete the requirements of their chosen health care pathway before high school graduation, upon enrollment at a public two-year or four-year postsecondary educational institution within the State of Mississippi and declaration of a health related major, as verified by the institution's registrar, shall be eligible for a reduced tuition rate that shall be determined by the respective institution of enrollment, provided that the reduction shall not be less than thirty percent (30%) of the total cost of attendance. SECTION 6. (1)  There is established in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the Mississippi Delta Medical Apprenticeship Program Trust Fund.  The purpose of the fund is to provide financial support to local school districts within the eligible counties for start-up costs and costs associated with implementing and operating the MS DMAP.  The fund may consist of monies obtained from grants from the federal government, funds made available by the Legislature, and grants, gifts, devises, donations and any other monies from any public or private source.  The State Board of Education and the State Board of Medical Licensure shall administer the fund and may apply for any grants from the federal government or private sources. (2)  The State Board of Education and the State Board of Medical Licensure, jointly, shall adopt rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this section.  If sufficient funds are available for this purpose, monies from the Mississippi Delta Medical Apprenticeship Program Trust Fund must be allocated to local school districts and participating licensed medical facilities in accordance with the procedures established by the State Board of Education and the State Board of Medical Licensure. SECTION 7.  Section 37-71-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-71-7.  (1)  For the 2021-2022 school term, the State Board of Education shall promulgate a rule by December 31, 2020, authorizing local school boards, in their discretion, to develop an Extended Learning Opportunity to include alternative educational opportunities available to students in Grade 9 through Grade 12, which are provided through apprenticeships, internships or pre-apprenticeships for elective course credit. (2)  Each local school board may adopt an Extended Learning Opportunities policy to include alternative educational opportunities for course credit that recognizes learning opportunities outside of the traditional classroom through apprenticeships, internships or pre-apprenticeships, and grants elective credit for those alternative learning opportunities.  If adopted the policy shall: (a)  Provide for an application process for entities to submit proposals for alternative educational opportunities that will qualify for elective course credit; (b)  Define which entities are eligible to submit applications for alternative educational opportunities, which such entities shall include, but not be limited to: (i)  Nonprofit organizations; (ii)  Businesses with established locations in the state; (iii)  Trade associations; (iv)  Parents of students involved in programs that may otherwise qualify for alternative educational opportunities;                    (v)  Teachers involved in programs outside of the traditional classroom; and (vi)  School personnel involved in programs outside of the traditional classroom * * *.; (c)  Provide for the criteria used to evaluate the alternative educational opportunity; (d)  Describe any communication and collaboration needed with local school districts to implement alternative educational opportunities approved by the State Board of Education; (e)  Place requirements on the entity such as background checks for key personnel and minimum accountability standards; and (f)  Provide a process for student credit transfer. (3)  The local school board is authorized to approve or deny an application for an alternative educational opportunity.  If an application is approved by the school board, the application shall be submitted to the State Board of Education for review as provided in Section 37-71-11, prior to the implementation of the program within the local school district. (4)  The State Department of Education shall have the authority to audit approved alternative educational programs at any time.  If the audit results in findings that an approved program is not meeting the provisions of this chapter or the policy outlined in subsection (2) of this section, then the local school board shall disqualify the program immediately. SECTION 8.  Section 37-71-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-71-9.  (1)  (a) Following the adoption of the rule required in Section 37-71-7, the department shall accept applications from local school districts for the implementation of alternative courses, programs and opportunities or apprenticeship programs. The department shall require an application for each alternative course, program or opportunity or apprenticeship program approved by a local school board to be implemented in its school district. (b)  Upon receipt of an application, the department shall have ninety (90) days to approve or deny the application.  Any denied application shall be returned to the submitting local school board and shall include an explanation of the reasons for denial of the application. (2)  The State Department of Education shall provide an annual report detailing the progress that has been made in each school district in providing alternative courses, programs and opportunities or apprenticeships.  The report shall be provided to the Chairmen of the Senate and House Education Committees no later than December 1 of each year, beginning December 1, 2021.  The report also shall be provided to the other members of the Legislature upon request and posted on the department's website for the general public to view. SECTION 9.  Section 37-71-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-71-11.  (1)  Beginning with July 1, 2020, a licensing authority shall grant a license to any student applicant who participates in an alternative learning course, program or opportunity or apprenticeship program, and who meets the following criteria: (a)  Completed an apprenticeship in the licensed occupation or profession; (b)  Attained a satisfactory industry certification score on the WorkKeys assessment, if such assessment is a required component of the alternative course or apprenticeship; (c)  Passed an examination, if one is deemed to be necessary by the licensing authority; and (d)  Paid any fees deemed necessary by the licensing authority. (2)  Licensing authorities shall establish a passing score for their respective examinations which shall not exceed the passing score that is required under the standard licensing processes.  If the relevant licensing authority or provision of law does not require an examination for the standard licensing process for an occupation, no examination may be required for applicants who complete an apprenticeship in that occupation. (3)  Licensing authorities shall establish a licensing fee, which shall not exceed the licensing fee that is required under the standard licensing processes.  If the relevant licensing authority or state does not require a fee for the standard licensing process for an occupation, no fee can be required for applicants who complete an apprenticeship in that occupation. (4)  Except as otherwise required by federal law, apprenticeships for an occupation shall not be required to exceed the number of hours required by the relevant licensing authority or statute for that occupation. (5)  Licensing authorities shall adopt necessary rules for the implementation of this section. SECTION 10.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.